South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4141.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-18-70(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) SLED maymust issue a license to a person who: (1) is at least twenty-one years of age; (2) has a high school diploma or equivalent; (3) is a citizen of the United States; (4) has not been convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude; (5) is of good moral character; (6) does not unlawfully use drugs; (7) does not use alcohol to such a degree as to affect adversely his ability to perform competently the duties of a private investigator, has not been adjudicated an incapacitated person without being restored to legal competency, and who has no physical or mental impairment which would prevent him from competently performing the duties of a private investigator; (8) has not been discharged from the military service with other than an honorable discharge; (9) has at least three years' experience: (a) as a private investigator employed by a licensed private investigation agency; (b) as an investigator for a law firm, a government agency, a private corporation, a nonprofit organization, or in a capacity that SLED determines has provided the requisite investigative experience;  or (c) as a sworn officer with a federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency; or (d) as an investigator or a role with investigation duties in military service with the United States Armed Forces. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----